Utah statutes.
19-6-302.5.   Retroactive effect.
(1)  The Legislature finds the language in this part, prior to the passage of
this act, did not clearly set forth procedures for identifying responsible
parties and allocating among those parties response costs at sites where
hazardous substances or materials have been released.  This lack of clarity
has interfered with effective allocation of costs of cleanup as required by
this part.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this act provides clarification
of the Legislature's original intent to facilitate cleanups of hazardous
substances or materials by providing clarification of procedures for
allocating liability and response costs.
(3) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that liability as determined
under this act applies retroactively to any release of a hazardous substance
or material subject to or currently in the process of investigation,
abatement, or corrective action under this part as of the effective date of
this act.
(b)  Any responsible party whose liability for cleanup costs is absolved or
altered by the provisions of this act is subject only to further costs or
action as required by this part.
